Illinois, session 104th, SB647.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Southeastern Illinois Economic Development 5Authority Act is amended by changing Section 5 as follows: 6    (70 ILCS 518/5)7    Sec. 5. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Southeastern Illinois Economic Development Authority Act. 9(Source: P.A. 93-968, eff. 8-20-04.)